th: การเชื่อมต่อคอยล์: เปลี่ยนแปลงได้; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; อื่นๆ
ja: コイル接続: 変更可能; 固定; その他
el: Σύνδεση πηνίου: Μεταβλητό; Σταθερή; Άλλο
nl: Spoelaansluiting: Verwisselbaar; Vast; Andere
lt-LT: Ritės jungtis: Keičiama; Fiksuotą; Kita
zh-TW: 線圈連接: 可替換的; 固定; 其他
pt-BR: Conexão da bobina: Mutável; Fixo; Outro
hr-HR: Spajanje grijača: Promjenjivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
ru: Тип спирали: Сменный; Стационарный; Другой
sk-SK: Pripojenie zvitku: Vymeniteľný; Opravený; Iné
de: Spulenverbindung: Wechselbar; Befestigt; Sonstiges
hu: Tekercs csatlakozása: Cserélhető; Rögzített; Egyéb
bg-BG: Свързване на намотка: Сменяема; Фиксирана; Други
fi: Käämin liitäntä: Vaihdettava; Pysyvä; Muu
ro-RO: Conexiune rezistență: Interschimbabilă; Fixă; Altele
zh-CN: 线圈接头: 多变; 固定; 其他
fr: Connexion de bobine: Changeable; Fixé; Autre
en: Coil connection: Changeable; Fixed; Other
pl: Połączenie cewki: Wymienny; Stałe; Inne
nb: Spoletilkobling: Utskiftbar; Fast; Annet
es: Conexión de bobina: Reemplazable; Fijo; Otros
sv: Spolanslutning: Utbytbar; Fast; Övrigt
vi: Cuộn điện: Có thể thay đổi; Cố định; Khác
da: Spoleforbindelse: Foranderlig; Fast; Andet
tr: Bobin bağlantısı: Değiştirilebilir; Sabit; Diğer
it: Collegamento della resistenza: Sostituibile; Fisso; Altro
cs: Typ žhavicí hlavy: Měnitelné; Pevný; Jiné
sl-SI: Namestitev tuljave: Spremenljiva; Fiksna; Drugo
ko: 코일 연결: 유동적; 고정; 기타
pt-PT: Ligação de bobina: Intercambiável; Fixo; Outro